src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv31_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: systir
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: systur
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: systur
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: systur
    systir+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: systrar
    systir+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: systrum
    systir+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: systra
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: systirin
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: systrina
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: systrini
    systir+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: systurinnar
    systir+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: systrarnar
    systir+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: systrunum
    systir+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: systranna
